src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON BUStem !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 ATTRCONT ;
 +Sg+Gen:u K ;
! +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub: K ;
 +Sg+Acc:u K ;
! +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub: K ;
 +Pl+Nom:ut K ;
 +Ess:un K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+A:»uš%> ATTRCONT ; 
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:»uš K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+A:»užža%> BUOREMUSSA- ;
 +Sg+Ill:uj K ;
 +Sg+Loc:us K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:un K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:ujn K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ujd K ;
 +PlGenCmp:ujd R ;
 +Pl+Acc:ujd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ujdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:ujn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Use/Sub:ujs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Com:ujgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:uj%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:ustti%> PxV ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:ujnni%> PxV ;
! +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:ujddi%> PxV ; !^P^ !MARG
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:ujddi%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:ujddi%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:ujddás%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:ujnni%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Com+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:ujddi%> PxPlComV1 ;
 +Der2+Der/at+Adv:ut K ;
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:u%> Px1V ;
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:u%> Px2V ;
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:u%> Px3V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:u%> Px1V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:u%> Px2V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:u%> Px3V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:u%> Px1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:u%> Px2V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:u%> Px3V ;
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:usa%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:uiddá%> Px1V ;

LEXICON EAMOS !!= * __@CODE@__
! The 3 next lines are for MALIS0
! minus the pointer to Ess Px.
 +Sg+Nom:%>X4 K ;
 +Ess:%>X4in K ;
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2 PxC ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>X2a K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:%>X2 K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2 PxC ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X2a K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:%>X2 K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2 PxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>X2at K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2asa%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2ijddá%> Px1V ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>X2ij K ;
 +Sg+Loc:%>X2is K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:%>X2in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:%>X2ijn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:%>X2ijnna K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>X2ijd K ;
 +PlGenCmp:%>X2ijd R ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>X2ijd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>X2ijdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:%>X2ijn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X2ijnna K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Use/Sub:%>X2ijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Com:%>X2ijgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:%>X2ij%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2istti%> PxV ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2ijnni%> PxV ;
! +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:%>X2ijddi%> PxV ; !^P^ !MARG
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2ijddi%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2ijddi%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2ijddás%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2ijnni%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Com+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2ijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;
 :%>X2 ADVC ;
 +Attr:%>X4 K ; ! Attributive superaltives
              ! Here and not in MALIS0 because
              ! also nouns go there.



LEXICON GAPPUS0 !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +SgNomCmp+Use/-Spell+Use/Sub@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@:X7@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@ R ;
 +SgNomCmp+Use/-Spell+Use/Sub@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@:@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@ R ;
 +SgNomCmp: R ;
+Use/-Spell: VUOHTA ;			! (callers have added +A already)
 +Ess:in K ;

!! Almost id. to MALIS0.
!! MALIS0 has no VUOHTA,
!! GAPPUS0 has no Px Ess., and
!! shouldn't have either.

LEXICON GAPPUS- !!= * __@CODE@__ !!= * __@CODE@__
 MALLAS- ; ! should be flipped with the rest.

!! GOAL: Keep GAPPUS- and MALLAS- apart, because of
!! the Px(1)V issue, but unify the rest.
!! GAPPUS- and MALLAS- differ
!! in the A and N treatment of
!! Pl Nom Px (only 1st p. for A
!! and all persons for N).
!! Now that MALLASI- is deleted,
!! GAPPUS- and MALLAS- are
!! identical. We check by pointing
!! GAPPUS- to MALLAS-. Look into this.
!! and remove GAPPUS- for MALLAS-
!! eventually.

LEXICON MEAHTTUN   !!= * __@CODE@__ Deverbal adjectives.
 +A:n%> ATTR ;
 +A:s%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A:m%> GAPPUS0 ;   ! NE and vuohta
 +A+Sg+Gen:m%>a K ; ! Stem vowel -a-, no short genitive
 +A+Sg+Gen:m%>a R ; ! Stem vowel -a-, no short genitive
 +A+Sg+Acc:m%>a K ;
 +A+Pl+Nom:m%>at K ;
 +A:m%>i MALLASI-/NUORABU- ;  ! obl
 +A+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:m%> PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:m%> PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:m%> PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:m%>asa%> PxV ;
 +A+Sg+Gen:m%> K ;
 +A+Sg+Acc:m%> K ;
 +A+Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:m%>iiddá%> Px1V ;

LEXICON LEXATTR_GEAHTES !!= * __@CODE@__
:keahtes LEXATTR ;
:geahtes LEXATTR ;

LEXICON GEAHTES !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Der4+Der/geahtes+A+Attr:»#geahtes K ;
 +Der4+Der/geahtes+A+Attr:»#keahtes K ;

LEXICON OVDDIT  !!= * __@CODE@__ Inherently comparative adjectives
 +A+Comp+Attr:%>b K ;
 +A+Comp:%>b BUStem ;
 +A+Superl:%>muss BUOREMUS ;

LEXICON MADDELEABBO  !!= * __@CODE@__ Inherently comparative adjectives
 +A+Comp+Attr:%> K ;
 +A:%> EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;







!! !!!Nominal derivation
! ------------------

!! !!Noun derivation
! - - - - - - - -


LEXICON VUOHTA  !!= * __@CODE@__ +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/DefPlGen
 +CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen+Der3+Der/vuohta+N:»»»#vuoh'ta@C.NeedNoun@ VUOHTAMORPH ;


LEXICON VUOHTAMORPH !!= * __@CODE@__
! NomV ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:%> Px3V ;
 +SgNomCmp+Use/Sub:%> R ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»viđá K ;
! +Der/viđi+Adv:»viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
 :%> GOAHTI-OBL ;
 :%> GOAHTE- ;
 +SgGenCmp:%>X4 R ;



LEXICON DenominalNounsV !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:»X6ž DIMINC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:»X6žažž JOHTOLAT0 ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:»X6žažža%> JOHTOLAHKA- ;
! +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:»X6ž DIMINC ;
! This is what I want, do this at some point!
! +Der/laš+N:»lažž MUSH ;
! this one was removed bec. of +Der/laš+A in the DenominalAdjsV
! lexicon. But was there any good reason for the laš -> MUSH
! pointer in the first place?

LEXICON DenominalNounsC !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:»ažž DIMINV ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:»ačča»ž MALIS0 ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:»ačča»ž MALLAS- ;
